Missouri, session 2026, HB2877.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 288, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto two new sections, to be
known as sections 288.135 and 288.136, to read as follows:
288.135. 1. This is hereby created in the state treasury the "Unemployment
Administration Adjustment Fund", which shall consist of money collected pursuant to
section 288.136, and such other state funds appropriated by the general assembly. The
state treasurer shall be custodian of the fund and may approve disbursements from the
fund in accordance with sections 30.170 and 30.180. Upon appropriation, money in the
fund shall be used solely for the purpose of defraying the cost of the administration of
this law, and for no other purpose whatsoever. Notwithstanding the provisions of
section 33.080 to the contrary, all moneys remaining in the fund at the end of the
biennium shall not revert to the credit of the general revenue fund. The state treasurer
shall invest moneys in the fund in the same manner as other funds are invested. Any
interest and money earned on such investments shall be credited to the fund.
2. The unemployment administration adjustment fund shall not be used in whole
or in part for any purpose or in any manner that would permit its substitution for, or a
corresponding reduction in, federal funds that would be available in its absence to
finance expenditures for the administration of this chapter, or cause the appropriate
agency of the United States government to withhold any part of an administrative grant
that would otherwise be made.
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 2877 2
288.136. 1. Each employer liable for contributions pursuant to this chapter,
except employers with a contribution rate equal to zero, shall pay an annual
unemployment administration adjustment in an amount equal to five one-hundredths
of one percent of such employer's total taxable wages for the twelve-month period
ending the preceding June thirtieth.
2. Notwithstanding subsection 1 of this section to the contrary, when the
September thirtieth balance of the unemployment administration adjustment fund is
forty million dollars or more, or if the average balance of the unemployment
compensation trust fund of the four preceding quarters (September thirtieth, June
thirtieth, March thirty-first, December thirty-first) is less than four hundred fifty
million dollars, no unemployment administration adjustment shall be applied in the
succeeding calendar year.
3. Each employer liable to pay an unemployment administration adjustment
shall be notified of the amount due under this section by March thirty-first of each year
and such amount shall be considered delinquent thirty days thereafter. Delinquent
unemployment administration adjustment amounts may be collected in the manner
provided under sections 288.160 and 288.170. All moneys collected under this section
shall be deposited in the unemployment administration adjustment fund established in
section 288.135.
4. For the first quarter of each calendar year, the total amount of contribution
otherwise due from each employer liable to pay contributions under this chapter shall
be reduced by the dollar amount due from such employer pursuant to the calculation in
subsection 1 of this section. However, the amount of contributions due from such
employer for the first quarter of the calendar year in question shall not be reduced
below zero.
✔